Utah statutes.
40-2-301.   Commission and office responsibilities.
(1)  The commissioner shall:
(a)  direct the state's efforts to promote coal mine safety; and
(b)  participate with the Mine Safety and Health Administration in an
investigation of a major coal mine accident in Utah.
(2)  The commission shall establish by rule, made in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:
(a)  a system consistent with Section 40-2-302 to receive, evaluate, and act
on a report of an alleged unsafe condition at a coal mine; and
(b)  requirements for a coal mine operator regarding notification of a coal
mine accident as part of a coal mine operator's emergency response plan.
(3)  The office may:
(a)  conduct one or more studies to promote coal mine safety;
(b)  cooperate with educational and other organizations to promote mining
engineering and mine safety training;
(c)  establish a cooperative relationship with the Mine Safety and Health
Administration to promote coal mine safety in Utah;
(d)  serve as the lead state agency in developing and implementing state and
local response and communication plans for major coal mine accidents in Utah;
and
(e)  implement the notification requirements established under Subsection
(2)(b).
